Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1521.13
Hazardous waste; site review committee; consider factors; enumerated.

Factors to be considered by the committee shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Economic considerations such as whether the facility is needed, profit expectations for the facility, how the facility will be operated, effects on the community, the potential for compensation to the local governing body, and aspects related to closure of the facility;

(2) The function of the facility, including the management processes involved, the wastes to be handled, the relationship to any integrated system or master plan for hazardous waste management, and plans for future expansion;

(3) Considerations related to the technology to be used such as why that process was chosen, plans for quality control, reliability of the technology, and the sequence of steps involved from generation of the wastes to postclosure of the facility;

(4) Characteristics of the site for the facility, the methods for determining the characteristics, and why the site was chosen;

(5) Surface drainage, ground water protection, air emissions, and other factors related to environmental quality;

(6) Transportation considerations such as methods to be used, waste containment during transport, party responsible for transport, timing of arrivals, routing, and response plans in case of spills;

(7) Plans for responses to emergencies and for site security, qualifications and training of personnel, and actions to be taken when there are operating problems; and

(8) Enforcement provisions, including applicable regulations, monitoring plans, who is responsible for enforcement, sequence and timing of possible enforcement, and the ability of governmental agencies to ensure compliance.

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 7.